Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB991.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Data Center Siting and Permitting Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Data center." A facility used to house computer systems and associated components, including servers, storage systems and networking equipment."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."NPDES." The National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System 123456789101112131415161718 under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (62 Stat. 1155, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.)."Power generation facility." A plant, equipment or system, whether located on a single site or across multiple contiguous parcels, that is designed and operated for the purpose of producing electricity from a fuel or energy source, including coal, natural gas, petroleum, nuclear, solar, wind, hydroelectric, geothermal, biomass, waste-to-energy or any other alternative resource, for delivery into the electric distribution system or regional transmission system or for on-site consumption."State agency." An office, department, authority, board or commission of the executive branch.Section 3. Preapproved sites.(a) Duty to select sites.--Not later than 90 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish a list of at least 15 sites that the department, in consultation with the Governor's Office and any other relevant State agency, finds appropriate for locating data centers in this Commonwealth. At least five of those sites selected shall be located on sites that are power generation facilities that are decommissioned or are scheduled to be decommissioned in the next two years.(b) Public posting.--The department shall post the list established under subsection (a) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Funding.--The Department of Community and Economic Development shall provide funding to the department from the Pennsylvania Strategic Investments To Enhance Sites, or PA SITES, Program.20250SB0991PN1142 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Preapproved sites.--(1) The department shall use the funding provided under subsection (c), appropriated or otherwise made available to the department for the purpose, to commence work related to identifying which State environmental permits are required for a data center site and to take action deemed necessary by the department to expedite permit reviews for locating a data center on a site identified on the list established under subsection (a).(2) If an applicant submits to the department an accelerated permitting initiation notice under section 4, the department shall provide to the applicant all preliminary work related to permitting that the department has conducted on the preapproved site to the applicant.Section 4. Accelerated permitting initiation.(a) Notification to department.--An applicant that proposes to build or operate a data center within this Commonwealth shall notify the department of the following on a form posted by the department on the department's publicly accessible Internet website:(1) The location of the proposed data center.(2) The energy source and capacity of any proposed power generation facility that will at least partially be used to power the data center and any electric transmission infrastructure.(b) Condition for accelerated permit.--A person may not file an application for an initial accelerated permit under section 5 until the notice has been submitted in accordance with this section.Section 5. Phase 1 accelerated permit.20250SB0991PN1142 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Application.--A person that has submitted a notice under section 4 may file an application with the department to participate in an accelerated permit process for all required permits for a data center, a power generation facility and any transmission infrastructure associated with the data center.(b) Fee.--The person must pay an initial permit fee to the department in the amount of $10,000 at the time of filing the application.(c) Zoning clearances.--The application must include a copy of any zoning clearance or approval and concept and commitment document for the project that contains such information as the department may require.(d) Certification required.--The information in the application must be certified and sealed by a professional licensed to practice in this Commonwealth. The professional shall certify that the information in the application meets or exceeds the standards required by all applicable laws and regulations to which the permit pertains.(e) Notice to proceed.--Within three days of receipt of an application under subsection (d), the department shall confirm receipt to the applicant and issue a notice to proceed.(f) Effect of notice to proceed.--(1) After receipt of the notice to proceed, the applicant may begin site preparation, brownfield rehabilitation, demolition work, storm water installation, earthmoving and other preparatory site work, excluding building construction of the data center or associated power generation facility.(2) Before moving to Phase 2 permitting under section 6, the applicant must submit to the department fully completed 20250SB0991PN1142 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permitting for all environmental justice requirements, NPDES permits, earthmoving permits and brownfield requirements.Section 6. Phase 2 permitting.(a) Final design and engineering plans.--At least 60 days before commencing the building construction stage of the project, the applicant must submit to the department all final design and engineering plans along with air quality permit applications.(b) Certification required.--All requirements shall be certified and sealed by a professional licensed to practice in this Commonwealth. The professional must certify that the information in the application meets or exceeds the standards required by all applicable laws and regulations to which the permits pertain.(c) Notice to proceed.--Within three days of receipt of an application under subsection (a), the department shall confirm receipt to the applicant and issue a notice to proceed.(d) Effect of notice to proceed.--An applicant upon receiving confirmation of receipt may begin final construction of the project.Section 7. Site inspection.(a) Power of department.--After an applicant submits a Phase 1 permitting application to the department, the department may conduct inspections of the site in question.(b) Cease order.--If the department finds that the applicant is violating any statute or regulation during an inspection, the department may issue an order to the applicant to immediately cease all work until the violation is corrected.Section 8. Prevailing wage.In order to be eligible for the accelerated permitting 20250SB0991PN1142 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 process under this act, an applicant must provide assurance that all jobs created during the construction process at the site shall be prevailing wage jobs.Section 9. Litigation.If a civil action is filed against any permit or aspect of a data center project, the department shall toll any timelines for use of a permit while the civil action is proceeding.Section 10. Expiration.No person may submit an application under this act after December 31, 2040.Section 11. Continuation of existing projects.Notwithstanding section 10, a project that begins the permitting process under this act before the expiration date may continue through the process even after expiration.Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0991PN1142 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516